Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2294.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706.2(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2706.2. Elk hunting licenses.(a) Application limitation.--Whenever the commission makes a determination to authorize a hunting season for the taking of elk[, no person may submit more than one application for an elk hunting license in any license year. The commission shall hold a random drawing of applications for the issuance of elk licenses under this subsection at the Elk Country Visitor Center in the Township of Benezette.], the commission shall:(1) Hold a random drawing of applications for the issuance of elk licenses under this subsection.(2) Announce the awarding of the elk licenses under this subsection at the Elk Country Visitor Center in the Township 12345678910111213141516171819 of Benezette.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2294PN3008 - 2 - 123